src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_utf8_alias.aff
FLAG num
SFX 244 Y 45
SFX 244 0 َته/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتهما/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتهم/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتها/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتهنَّ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتكَ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتكِ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتكُما/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتكُم/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتكُنَّ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِي/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتنا/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتُهُ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتُهُما/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتُهُم/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتُها/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتُهُنَّ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتُكَ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتُكِ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتُكُما/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتُكُم/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتُكُنَّ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتُنا/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتَهُ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتَهُما/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتَهُم/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتَها/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتَهُنَّ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتَكَ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتَكِ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتَكُما/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتَكُم/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتَكُنَّ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتَنا/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِهِ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِهِما/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِهِم/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِها/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِهِنَّ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِكَ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِكِ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِكُما/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِكُم/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِكُنَّ/158 . 282
SFX 244 0 َتِنا/158 . 282
SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 0 ْ/146 . 330
SFX 143 Y 22
SFX 143 0 َّهُ/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 َّهُما/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 َّهُم/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 َّها/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 َّهُنَّ/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 َّكَ/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 َّكِ/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 َّكُما/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 َّكُم/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 َّكُنَّ/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 َّنِي/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 َّنا/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 ّاهُ/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 ّاهُما/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 ّاهُم/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 ّاها/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 ّاهُنَّ/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 ّاكَ/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 ّاكِ/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 ّاكُما/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 ّاكُم/146 . 287
SFX 143 0 ّاكُنَّ/146 . 287
SFX 194 Y 1
SFX 194 0 آتُ/147 . 261
SFX 471 Y 1
SFX 471 0 0/190 . 268
SFX 253 Y 2
SFX 253 0 اتٍ/162 . 331
SFX 253 0 اتٍ/162 . 331
SFX 90 Y 1
SFX 90 0 ُ/146 . 332
SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 0 ِي/146 . 333
SFX 205 Y 1
SFX 205 0 ِينَ/156 . 266
SFX 149 Y 12
SFX 149 0 ُوهُ/146 . 288
SFX 149 0 ُوهُما/146 . 288
SFX 149 0 ُوهُم/146 . 288
SFX 149 0 ُوها/146 . 288
SFX 149 0 ُوهُنَّ/146 . 288
SFX 149 0 ُوكَ/146 . 288
SFX 149 0 ُوكِ/146 . 288
SFX 149 0 ُوكُما/146 . 288
SFX 149 0 ُوكُم/146 . 288
SFX 149 0 ُوكُنَّ/146 . 288
SFX 149 0 ُونِي/146 . 288
SFX 149 0 ُونا/146 . 288
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 0 َة/147 . 246
SFX 519 Y 1
SFX 519 0 ا/203 . 242
SFX 568 Y 1
SFX 568 0 0/204 . 229
SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179 0 انِ/147 . 249
SFX 320 Y 1
SFX 320 0 0/187 . 229
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 ات/147 . 256
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 0 ُوا/164 . 232
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 0 َتَيْنِ/169 . 276
SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 0 َوْا/152 . 247
SFX 228 Y 13
SFX 228 0 َتَيْ/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيْهِ/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيْهِما/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيْهِم/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيْها/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيْهِنَّ/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيْكَ/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيْكِ/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيْكُما/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيْكُم/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيْكُنَّ/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيَّ/169 . 327
SFX 228 0 َتَيْنا/169 . 327
SFX 246 Y 13
SFX 246 0 ُو/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ُوهُ/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ُوهُما/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ُوهُم/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ُوها/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ُوهُنَّ/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ُوكَ/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ُوكِ/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ُوكُما/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ُوكُم/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ُوكُنَّ/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ِيَّ/158 . 271
SFX 246 0 ُونا/158 . 271
SFX 408 Y 7
SFX 408 0 هُ/205 . 263
SFX 408 0 هُما/205 . 263
SFX 408 0 هُم/205 . 263
SFX 408 0 ها/205 . 263
SFX 408 0 هُنَّ/205 . 263
SFX 408 0 نِي/205 . 263
SFX 408 0 نا/205 . 263
SFX 254 Y 45
SFX 254 0 اته/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتهما/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتهم/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتها/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتهنَّ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتكَ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتكِ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتكُما/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتكُم/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتكُنَّ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِي/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتنا/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتُهُ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتُهُما/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتُهُم/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتُها/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتُهُنَّ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتُكَ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتُكِ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتُكُما/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتُكُم/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتُكُنَّ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتُنا/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِهِ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِهِما/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِهِم/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِها/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِهِنَّ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِكَ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِكِ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِكُما/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِكُم/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِكُنَّ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِنا/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِهِ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِهِما/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِهِم/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِها/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِهِنَّ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِكَ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِكِ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِكُما/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِكُم/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِكُنَّ/162 . 334
SFX 254 0 اتِنا/162 . 334
SFX 252 Y 2
SFX 252 0 اتِ/162 . 254
SFX 252 0 اتِ/162 . 254
SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 0 ُوا/146 . 317
SFX 400 Y 7
SFX 400 0 انِهِ/151 . 335
SFX 400 0 انِهِما/151 . 335
SFX 400 0 انِهِم/151 . 335
SFX 400 0 انِها/151 . 335
SFX 400 0 انِهِنَّ/151 . 335
SFX 400 0 انِنِي/151 . 335
SFX 400 0 انِنا/151 . 335
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 0 ُونَ/158 . 228
SFX 392 Y 7
SFX 392 0 انِهِ/206 . 335
SFX 392 0 انِهِما/206 . 335
SFX 392 0 انِهِم/206 . 335
SFX 392 0 انِها/206 . 335
SFX 392 0 انِهِنَّ/206 . 335
SFX 392 0 انِنِي/206 . 335
SFX 392 0 انِنا/206 . 335
SFX 81 Y 1
SFX 81 0 ِي/152 . 336
SFX 576 Y 1
SFX 576 0 0/200 . 229
SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 0 َة/144 . 246
SFX 484 Y 7
SFX 484 0 هُ/189 . 263
SFX 484 0 هُما/189 . 263
SFX 484 0 هُم/189 . 263
SFX 484 0 ها/189 . 263
SFX 484 0 هُنَّ/189 . 263
SFX 484 0 نِي/189 . 263
SFX 484 0 نا/189 . 263
SFX 485 Y 5
SFX 485 0 كَ/189 . 225
SFX 485 0 كِ/189 . 225
SFX 485 0 كُما/189 . 225
SFX 485 0 كُم/189 . 225
SFX 485 0 كُنَّ/189 . 225
SFX 447 Y 1
SFX 447 0 وْا/177 . 257
SFX 435 Y 1
SFX 435 0 وْا/166 . 257
SFX 486 Y 1
SFX 486 0 نِ/189 . 227
SFX 212 Y 2
SFX 212 0 اتٍ/169 . 331
SFX 212 0 اتٍ/169 . 331
SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177 0 َ/147 . 329
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 0 ات/144 . 256
SFX 454 Y 7
SFX 454 0 ُوهُ/164 . 253
SFX 454 0 ُوهُما/164 . 253
SFX 454 0 ُوهُم/164 . 253
SFX 454 0 ُوها/164 . 253
SFX 454 0 ُوهُنَّ/164 . 253
SFX 454 0 ُونِي/164 . 253
SFX 454 0 ُونا/164 . 253
SFX 67 Y 12
SFX 67 0 هُ/152 . 264
SFX 67 0 هُما/152 . 264
SFX 67 0 هُم/152 . 264
SFX 67 0 ها/152 . 264
SFX 67 0 هُنَّ/152 . 264
SFX 67 0 كَ/152 . 264
SFX 67 0 كِ/152 . 264
SFX 67 0 كُما/152 . 264
SFX 67 0 كُم/152 . 264
SFX 67 0 كُنَّ/152 . 264
SFX 67 0 نِي/152 . 264
SFX 67 0 نا/152 . 264
SFX 455 Y 5
SFX 455 0 ُوكَ/164 . 255
SFX 455 0 ُوكِ/164 . 255
SFX 455 0 ُوكُما/164 . 255
SFX 455 0 ُوكُم/164 . 255
SFX 455 0 ُوكُنَّ/164 . 255
SFX 65 Y 12
SFX 65 0 َوْهُ/152 . 265
SFX 65 0 َوْهُما/152 . 265
SFX 65 0 َوْهُم/152 . 265
SFX 65 0 َوْها/152 . 265
SFX 65 0 َوْهُنَّ/152 . 265
SFX 65 0 َوْكَ/152 . 265
SFX 65 0 َوْكِ/152 . 265
SFX 65 0 َوْكُما/152 . 265
SFX 65 0 َوْكُم/152 . 265
SFX 65 0 َوْكُنَّ/152 . 265
SFX 65 0 َوْنِي/152 . 265
SFX 65 0 َوْنا/152 . 265
SFX 160 Y 5
SFX 160 0 هِ/146 . 321
SFX 160 0 هِما/146 . 321
SFX 160 0 هِم/146 . 321
SFX 160 0 ها/146 . 321
SFX 160 0 هِنَّ/146 . 321
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 0 ِ/147 . 224
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 0 0/203 . 268
SFX 159 Y 7
SFX 159 0 ُوهُ/146 . 323
SFX 159 0 ُوهُما/146 . 323
SFX 159 0 ُوهُم/146 . 323
SFX 159 0 ُوها/146 . 323
SFX 159 0 ُوهُنَّ/146 . 323
SFX 159 0 ُونِي/146 . 323
SFX 159 0 ُونا/146 . 323
SFX 155 Y 7
SFX 155 0 ْهُ/146 . 325
SFX 155 0 ْهُما/146 . 325
SFX 155 0 ْهُم/146 . 325
SFX 155 0 ْها/146 . 325
SFX 155 0 ْهُنَّ/146 . 325
SFX 155 0 ْنِي/146 . 325
SFX 155 0 ْنا/146 . 325
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 ا/152 . 297
SFX 517 Y 7
SFX 517 0 هُ/165 . 263
SFX 517 0 هُما/165 . 263
SFX 517 0 هُم/165 . 263
SFX 517 0 ها/165 . 263
SFX 517 0 هُنَّ/165 . 263
SFX 517 0 نِي/165 . 263
SFX 517 0 نا/165 . 263
SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176 0 ُ/147 . 332
SFX 518 Y 5
SFX 518 0 كَ/165 . 225
SFX 518 0 كِ/165 . 225
SFX 518 0 كُما/165 . 225
SFX 518 0 كُم/165 . 225
SFX 518 0 كُنَّ/165 . 225
SFX 428 Y 7
SFX 428 0 َّهُ/171 . 284
SFX 428 0 َّهُما/171 . 284
SFX 428 0 َّهُم/171 . 284
SFX 428 0 َّها/171 . 284
SFX 428 0 َّهُنَّ/171 . 284
SFX 428 0 َّنِي/171 . 284
SFX 428 0 َّنا/171 . 284
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 0 0/144 . 229
SFX 424 Y 7
SFX 424 0 َّهُ/154 . 284
SFX 424 0 َّهُما/154 . 284
SFX 424 0 َّهُم/154 . 284
SFX 424 0 َّها/154 . 284
SFX 424 0 َّهُنَّ/154 . 284
SFX 424 0 َّنِي/154 . 284
SFX 424 0 َّنا/154 . 284
SFX 213 Y 45
SFX 213 0 اته/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتهما/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتهم/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتها/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتهنَّ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتكَ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتكِ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتكُما/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتكُم/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتكُنَّ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِي/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتنا/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتُهُ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتُهُما/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتُهُم/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتُها/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتُهُنَّ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتُكَ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتُكِ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتُكُما/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتُكُم/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتُكُنَّ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتُنا/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِهِ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِهِما/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِهِم/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِها/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِهِنَّ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِكَ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِكِ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِكُما/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِكُم/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِكُنَّ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِنا/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِهِ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِهِما/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِهِم/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِها/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِهِنَّ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِكَ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِكِ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِكُما/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِكُم/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِكُنَّ/169 . 334
SFX 213 0 اتِنا/169 . 334
SFX 211 Y 2
SFX 211 0 اتِ/169 . 254
SFX 211 0 اتِ/169 . 254
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 ا/152 . 302
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 َيْنِ/156 . 277
SFX 448 Y 7
SFX 448 0 وْهُ/177 . 267
SFX 448 0 وْهُما/177 . 267
SFX 448 0 وْهُم/177 . 267
SFX 448 0 وْها/177 . 267
SFX 448 0 وْهُنَّ/177 . 267
SFX 448 0 وْنِي/177 . 267
SFX 448 0 وْنا/177 . 267
SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95 0 اً/146 . 337
SFX 436 Y 7
SFX 436 0 وْهُ/166 . 267
SFX 436 0 وْهُما/166 . 267
SFX 436 0 وْهُم/166 . 267
SFX 436 0 وْها/166 . 267
SFX 436 0 وْهُنَّ/166 . 267
SFX 436 0 وْنِي/166 . 267
SFX 436 0 وْنا/166 . 267
SFX 449 Y 5
SFX 449 0 وْكَ/177 . 269
SFX 449 0 وْكِ/177 . 269
SFX 449 0 وْكُما/177 . 269
SFX 449 0 وْكُم/177 . 269
SFX 449 0 وْكُنَّ/177 . 269
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 ِّي/146 . 301
SFX 437 Y 5
SFX 437 0 وْكَ/166 . 269
SFX 437 0 وْكِ/166 . 269
SFX 437 0 وْكُما/166 . 269
SFX 437 0 وْكُم/166 . 269
SFX 437 0 وْكُنَّ/166 . 269
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 0 وْنَ/177 . 278
SFX 36 Y 13
SFX 36 0 َيْ/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيْهِ/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيْهِما/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيْهِم/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيْها/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيْهِنَّ/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيْكَ/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيْكِ/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيْكُما/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيْكُم/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيْكُنَّ/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيَّ/152 . 316
SFX 36 0 َيْنا/152 . 316
SFX 589 Y 5
SFX 589 0 ه/194 . 236
SFX 589 0 هما/194 . 236
SFX 589 0 هم/194 . 236
SFX 589 0 ها/194 . 236
SFX 589 0 هنَّ/194 . 236
SFX 438 Y 1
SFX 438 0 وْنَ/166 . 278
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 0 ُوا/195 . 232
SFX 590 Y 5
SFX 590 0 كَ/194 . 239
SFX 590 0 كِ/194 . 239
SFX 590 0 كُما/194 . 239
SFX 590 0 كُم/194 . 239
SFX 590 0 كُنَّ/194 . 239
SFX 505 Y 7
SFX 505 0 انِهِ/155 . 335
SFX 505 0 انِهِما/155 . 335
SFX 505 0 انِهِم/155 . 335
SFX 505 0 انِها/155 . 335
SFX 505 0 انِهِنَّ/155 . 335
SFX 505 0 انِنِي/155 . 335
SFX 505 0 انِنا/155 . 335
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 َيْنِ/152 . 277
SFX 493 Y 7
SFX 493 0 انِهِ/145 . 335
SFX 493 0 انِهِما/145 . 335
SFX 493 0 انِهِم/145 . 335
SFX 493 0 انِها/145 . 335
SFX 493 0 انِهِنَّ/145 . 335
SFX 493 0 انِنِي/145 . 335
SFX 493 0 انِنا/145 . 335
SFX 506 Y 5
SFX 506 0 انِكَ/155 . 338
SFX 506 0 انِكِ/155 . 338
SFX 506 0 انِكُما/155 . 338
SFX 506 0 انِكُم/155 . 338
SFX 506 0 انِكُنَّ/155 . 338
SFX 459 Y 1
SFX 459 0 ُوا/163 . 232
SFX 494 Y 5
SFX 494 0 انِكَ/145 . 338
SFX 494 0 انِكِ/145 . 338
SFX 494 0 انِكُما/145 . 338
SFX 494 0 انِكُم/145 . 338
SFX 494 0 انِكُنَّ/145 . 338
